New York, session 2025-2026, S1837.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. Study on the height of overhead utility lines and communication 4 lines; agricultural equipment. 1. The chairperson of the public service 5 commission is hereby authorized and directed to study the implementation 6 of this chapter of law in regard to the height of overhead communication 7 lines or cables including but not limited to telegraph lines and tele- 8 phone lines, and any other overhead utility line or cable the chair- 9 person deems necessary to complete such study. 10 2. The study shall include, but not be limited to examining: 11 a. the use of and compliance with the national electric safety code 12 line height standard; 13 b. instances of vehicles, including but not limited to agricultural 14 equipment and any other off-road heavy duty equipment, coming into 15 contact with communication lines, utility lines and any other overhead 16 line or cable; and 17 c. whether such national electric safety code line height standard is 18 sufficient with the increased size of agricultural equipment and other 19 off-road heavy duty equipment to ensure safe passage of such equipment 20 under such lines or cables. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05425-01-5 S. 1837 2 1 3. The study conducted pursuant to this section shall be completed and 2 a report on such study shall be submitted to the governor and the legis- 3 lature no later than one year after the effective date of this section. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed January 1, 2028.